Vermont, session 2025-2026, H275.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 4080e is amended to read:
§ 4080e. MEDICARE SUPPLEMENTAL HEALTH INSURANCE
POLICIES; COMMUNITY RATING; DISABILITY
* * *
(e)(1) A health insurance company, hospital or medical service corporation,
or health maintenance organization offering a Medicare supplement insurance
policy shall guarantee acceptance of an individual’s application for coverage
during the six-month period following the individual’s 65th birthday and
during an annual open enrollment period that shall coincide with the federal
open enrollment period for Medicare Part D plans. A health insurance
company, hospital or medical service corporation, or health maintenance
organization offering a Medicare supplement insurance policy shall not make
any premium rate distinctions or charge any additional fees or penalty amounts
based on an applicant’s failure to enroll in a Medicare supplement insurance
policy during the applicant’s initial open enrollment period upon attaining 65
years of age.
(2) A health insurance company, hospital or medical service
corporation, or health maintenance organization offering a Medicare
supplement insurance policy shall not exclude, restrict, or otherwise limit
coverage under the policy for any preexisting health condition.
VT LEG #380832 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.275
2025 Page 3 of 3
(3) A health insurance company, hospital or medical service
corporation, or health maintenance organization offering a Medicare
supplement insurance policy shall allow an enrollee to change at any time from
one Medicare supplement insurance policy to another policy offering
comparable or lesser benefits.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380832 v.1